Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2213
Clerks of courts of record other than district courts; duties.

The provisions of sections 25-2204 to 25-2211 shall, as far as applicable, apply to clerks of other courts of record.

R.S.1867, Code § 888, p. 548;

R.S.1913, § 8562;

C.S.1922, § 9513;

C.S.1929, § 20-2214;

R.S.1943, § 25-2213;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 14;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 40.